Illinois, session 104th, SB274.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Police Training Act is amended by 5changing Sections 2, 6, and 7 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 705/2)  (from Ch. 85, par. 502)7    Sec. 2. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 8context otherwise requires:9    "Basic training candidate" means a person enrolled in 10basic training school who is not a full-time or part-time law 11enforcement officer. 12    "Board" means the Illinois Law Enforcement Training 13Standards Board.14    "Full-time law enforcement officer" means a law 15enforcement officer who has completed the officer's 16probationary period and is employed on a full-time basis as a 17law enforcement officer by a local government agency, State 18government agency, or as a campus police officer by a 19university, college, or community college. 20    "Law Enforcement agency" means any entity with statutory 21police powers and the ability to employ individuals authorized 22to make arrests. It does not include the Illinois State Police 23as defined in the State Police Act. A law enforcement agency   SB0274- 2 -LRB104 03914 RLC 13938 b1may include any university, college, or community college. 2    "Local law enforcement agency" means any law enforcement 3unit of government or municipal corporation in this State. It 4does not include the State of Illinois or any office, officer, 5department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency of 6the State, except that it does include a State-controlled 7university, college or public community college.8    "State law enforcement agency" means any law enforcement 9agency of this State. This includes any office, officer, 10department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency of 11the State. It does not include the Illinois State Police as 12defined in the State Police Act.13    "Panel" means the Certification Review Panel. 14    "Basic training school" means any school located within 15the State of Illinois whether privately or publicly owned 16which offers a course in basic law enforcement or county 17corrections training and has been approved by the Board.18    "Probationary police officer" means a recruit law 19enforcement officer required to successfully complete initial 20minimum basic training requirements at a basic training school 21to be eligible for permanent full-time employment as a local 22law enforcement officer.23    "Probationary part-time police officer" means a recruit 24part-time law enforcement officer required to successfully 25complete initial minimum part-time training requirements to be 26eligible for employment on a part-time basis as a local law   SB0274- 3 -LRB104 03914 RLC 13938 b1enforcement officer.2    "Permanent law enforcement officer" means a law 3enforcement officer who has completed the officer's 4probationary period and is permanently employed on a full-time 5basis as a local law enforcement officer, as a security 6officer, or campus police officer permanently employed by a 7law enforcement agency.8    "Part-time law enforcement officer" means a law 9enforcement officer who has completed the officer's 10probationary period and is employed on a part-time basis as a 11law enforcement officer or as a campus police officer by a law 12enforcement agency.13    "Law enforcement officer" means (i) any police officer of 14a law enforcement agency who is primarily responsible for 15prevention or detection of crime and the enforcement of the 16criminal code, traffic, or highway laws of this State or any 17political subdivision of this State or (ii) any member of a 18police force appointed and maintained as provided in Section 2 19of the Railroad Police Act.20    "Recruit" means any full-time or part-time law enforcement 21officer or full-time county corrections officer who is 22enrolled in an approved training course.23    "Review Committee" means the committee at the Board for 24certification disciplinary cases in which the Panel, a law 25enforcement officer, or a law enforcement agency may file for 26reconsideration of a decertification decision made by the   SB0274- 4 -LRB104 03914 RLC 13938 b1Board. 2    "Probationary county corrections officer" means a recruit 3county corrections officer required to successfully complete 4initial minimum basic training requirements at a basic 5training school to be eligible for permanent employment on a 6full-time basis as a county corrections officer.7    "Permanent county corrections officer" means a county 8corrections officer who has completed the officer's 9probationary period and is permanently employed on a full-time 10basis as a county corrections officer by a participating law 11enforcement agency.12    "County corrections officer" means any sworn officer of 13the sheriff who is primarily responsible for the control and 14custody of offenders, detainees or inmates.15    "Probationary court security officer" means a recruit 16court security officer required to successfully complete 17initial minimum basic training requirements at a designated 18training school to be eligible for employment as a court 19security officer.20    "Permanent court security officer" means a court security 21officer who has completed the officer's probationary period 22and is employed as a court security officer by a participating 23law enforcement agency.24    "Court security officer" has the meaning ascribed to it in 25Section 3-6012.1 of the Counties Code.26(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 1-1-22; 102-694, eff. 1-7-22.)   SB0274- 5 -LRB104 03914 RLC 13938 b1    (50 ILCS 705/6)  (from Ch. 85, par. 506)2    Sec. 6. Powers and duties of the Board; selection and 3certification of schools. The Board shall select and certify 4schools within the State of Illinois for the purpose of 5providing basic training for basic training candidates, 6probationary law enforcement officers, probationary county 7corrections officers, and court security officers and of 8providing advanced or in-service training for permanent law 9enforcement officers or permanent county corrections officers, 10which schools may be either publicly or privately owned and 11operated. In addition, the Board has the following power and 12duties:13        a. To require law enforcement agencies to furnish such 14    reports and information as the Board deems necessary to 15    fully implement this Act.16        b. To establish appropriate mandatory minimum 17    standards relating to the training of probationary local 18    law enforcement officers or probationary county 19    corrections officers, and in-service training of permanent 20    law enforcement officers.21        c. To provide appropriate certification to those 22    probationary officers who successfully complete the 23    prescribed minimum standard basic training course.24        d. To review and approve annual training curriculum 25    for county sheriffs.  SB0274- 6 -LRB104 03914 RLC 13938 b1        e. To review and approve applicants to ensure that no 2    applicant is admitted to a certified academy unless the 3    applicant is a person of good character and has not been 4    convicted of, found guilty of, entered a plea of guilty 5    to, or entered a plea of nolo contendere to a felony 6    offense, any of the misdemeanors in Sections 11-1.50, 7    11-6, 11-6.5, 11-6.6, 11-9.1, 11-9.1B, 11-14, 11-14.1, 8    11-30, 12-2, 12-3.2, 12-3.4, 12-3.5, 16-1, 17-1, 17-2, 9    26.5-1, 26.5-2, 26.5-3, 28-3, 29-1, any misdemeanor in 10    violation of any Section of Part E of Title III of the 11    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or 12    subsection (a) of Section 17-32 of the Criminal Code of 13    1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or Section 5 or 5.2 of 14    the Cannabis Control Act, or a crime involving moral 15    turpitude under the laws of this State or any other state 16    which if committed in this State would be punishable as a 17    felony or a crime of moral turpitude, or any felony or 18    misdemeanor in violation of federal law or the law of any 19    state that is the equivalent of any of the offenses 20    specified therein. The Board may appoint investigators who 21    shall enforce the duties conferred upon the Board by this 22    Act.23        For purposes of this paragraph e, a person is 24    considered to have been convicted of, found guilty of, or 25    entered a plea of guilty to, plea of nolo contendere to 26    regardless of whether the adjudication of guilt or   SB0274- 7 -LRB104 03914 RLC 13938 b1    sentence is withheld or not entered thereon. This includes 2    sentences of supervision, conditional discharge, or first 3    offender probation, or any similar disposition provided 4    for by law. 5        f. To establish statewide standards for minimum 6    standards regarding regular mental health screenings for 7    probationary and permanent police officers, ensuring that 8    counseling sessions and screenings remain confidential. 9        g. To review and ensure all law enforcement officers 10    remain in compliance with this Act, and any administrative 11    rules adopted under this Act.12        h. To suspend any certificate for a definite period, 13    limit or restrict any certificate, or revoke any 14    certificate.15        i. The Board and the Panel shall have power to secure 16    by its subpoena and bring before it any person or entity in 17    this State and to take testimony either orally or by 18    deposition or both with the same fees and mileage and in 19    the same manner as prescribed by law in judicial 20    proceedings in civil cases in circuit courts of this 21    State. The Board and the Panel shall also have the power to 22    subpoena the production of documents, papers, files, 23    books, documents, and records, whether in physical or 24    electronic form, in support of the charges and for 25    defense, and in connection with a hearing or 26    investigation.  SB0274- 8 -LRB104 03914 RLC 13938 b1        j. The Executive Director, the administrative law 2    judge designated by the Executive Director, and each 3    member of the Board and the Panel shall have the power to 4    administer oaths to witnesses at any hearing that the 5    Board is authorized to conduct under this Act and any 6    other oaths required or authorized to be administered by 7    the Board under this Act.8        k. In case of the neglect or refusal of any person to 9    obey a subpoena issued by the Board and the Panel, any 10    circuit court, upon application of the Board and the 11    Panel, through the Illinois Attorney General, may order 12    such person to appear before the Board and the Panel give 13    testimony or produce evidence, and any failure to obey 14    such order is punishable by the court as a contempt 15    thereof. This order may be served by personal delivery, by 16    email, or by mail to the address of record or email address 17    of record. 18        l. The Board shall have the power to administer state 19    certification examinations. Any and all records related to 20    these examinations, including, but not limited to, test 21    questions, test formats, digital files, answer responses, 22    answer keys, and scoring information shall be exempt from 23    disclosure. 24        m. To make grants, subject to appropriation, to units 25    of local government and public institutions of higher 26    education for the purposes of hiring and retaining law   SB0274- 9 -LRB104 03914 RLC 13938 b1    enforcement officers. 2        n. To make grants, subject to appropriation, to local 3    law enforcement agencies for costs associated with the 4    expansion and support of National Integrated Ballistic 5    Information Network (NIBIN) and other ballistic technology 6    equipment for ballistic testing. 7(Source: P.A. 102-687, eff. 12-17-21; 102-694, eff. 1-7-22; 8102-1115, eff. 1-9-23; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23.) 9    (50 ILCS 705/7)10    Sec. 7. Rules and standards for schools. The Board shall 11adopt rules and minimum standards for such schools which shall 12include, but not be limited to, the following:13        a. The curriculum for basic training candidates and 14    probationary law enforcement officers which shall be 15    offered by all certified schools shall include, but not be 16    limited to, courses of procedural justice, arrest and use 17    and control tactics, search and seizure, including 18    temporary questioning, civil rights, human rights, human 19    relations, cultural competency, including implicit bias 20    and racial and ethnic sensitivity, criminal law, law of 21    criminal procedure, constitutional and proper use of law 22    enforcement authority, crisis intervention training, 23    vehicle and traffic law including uniform and 24    non-discriminatory enforcement of the Illinois Vehicle 25    Code, traffic control and crash investigation, techniques   SB0274- 10 -LRB104 03914 RLC 13938 b1    of obtaining physical evidence, court testimonies, 2    statements, reports, firearms training, training in the 3    use of electronic control devices, including the 4    psychological and physiological effects of the use of 5    those devices on humans, first aid (including 6    cardiopulmonary resuscitation), training in the 7    administration of opioid antagonists as defined in 8    paragraph (1) of subsection (e) of Section 5-23 of the 9    Substance Use Disorder Act, handling of juvenile 10    offenders, recognition of mental conditions and crises, 11    including, but not limited to, the disease of addiction, 12    which require immediate assistance and response and 13    methods to safeguard and provide assistance to a person in 14    need of mental treatment, recognition of abuse, neglect, 15    financial exploitation, and self-neglect of adults with 16    disabilities and older adults, as defined in Section 2 of 17    the Adult Protective Services Act, crimes against the 18    elderly, law of evidence, the hazards of high-speed police 19    vehicle chases with an emphasis on alternatives to the 20    high-speed chase, and physical training. The curriculum 21    shall include specific training in techniques for 22    immediate response to and investigation of cases of 23    domestic violence and of sexual assault of adults and 24    children, including cultural perceptions and common myths 25    of sexual assault and sexual abuse as well as interview 26    techniques that are age sensitive and are trauma informed,   SB0274- 11 -LRB104 03914 RLC 13938 b1    victim centered, and victim sensitive. The curriculum 2    shall include training in techniques designed to promote 3    effective communication at the initial contact with crime 4    victims and ways to comprehensively explain to victims and 5    witnesses their rights under the Rights of Crime Victims 6    and Witnesses Act and the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 7    The curriculum shall also include training in effective 8    recognition of and responses to stress, trauma, and 9    post-traumatic stress experienced by law enforcement 10    officers that is consistent with Section 25 of the 11    Illinois Mental Health First Aid Training Act in a peer 12    setting, including recognizing signs and symptoms of 13    work-related cumulative stress, issues that may lead to 14    suicide, and solutions for intervention with peer support 15    resources. The curriculum shall include a block of 16    instruction addressing the mandatory reporting 17    requirements under the Abused and Neglected Child 18    Reporting Act. The curriculum shall also include a block 19    of instruction aimed at identifying and interacting with 20    persons with autism and other developmental or physical 21    disabilities, reducing barriers to reporting crimes 22    against persons with autism, and addressing the unique 23    challenges presented by cases involving victims or 24    witnesses with autism and other developmental 25    disabilities. The curriculum shall include training in the 26    detection and investigation of all forms of human   SB0274- 12 -LRB104 03914 RLC 13938 b1    trafficking. The curriculum shall also include instruction 2    in trauma-informed responses designed to ensure the 3    physical safety and well-being of a child of an arrested 4    parent or immediate family member; this instruction must 5    include, but is not limited to: (1) understanding the 6    trauma experienced by the child while maintaining the 7    integrity of the arrest and safety of officers, suspects, 8    and other involved individuals; (2) de-escalation tactics 9    that would include the use of force when reasonably 10    necessary; and (3) inquiring whether a child will require 11    supervision and care. The curriculum for basic training 12    candidates and probationary law enforcement officers shall 13    include: (1) at least 12 hours of hands-on, scenario-based 14    role-playing; (2) at least 6 hours of instruction on use 15    of force techniques, including the use of de-escalation 16    techniques to prevent or reduce the need for force 17    whenever safe and feasible; (3) specific training on 18    officer safety techniques, including cover, concealment, 19    and time; and (4) at least 6 hours of training focused on 20    high-risk traffic stops. The curriculum for permanent law 21    enforcement officers shall include, but not be limited to: 22    (1) refresher and in-service training in any of the 23    courses listed above in this subparagraph, (2) advanced 24    courses in any of the subjects listed above in this 25    subparagraph, (3) training for supervisory personnel, and 26    (4) specialized training in subjects and fields to be   SB0274- 13 -LRB104 03914 RLC 13938 b1    selected by the board. The training in the use of 2    electronic control devices shall be conducted for basic 3    training candidates and probationary law enforcement 4    officers, including University police officers. The 5    curriculum shall also include training on the use of a 6    firearms restraining order by providing instruction on the 7    process used to file a firearms restraining order and how 8    to identify situations in which a firearms restraining 9    order is appropriate.10        b. Minimum courses of study, attendance requirements 11    and equipment requirements.12        c. Minimum requirements for instructors.13        d. Minimum basic training requirements, which a basic 14    training candidate and probationary law enforcement 15    officer must satisfactorily complete before being eligible 16    for permanent employment as a local law enforcement 17    officer for a participating local governmental or State 18    governmental agency. Those requirements shall include 19    training in first aid (including cardiopulmonary 20    resuscitation).21        e. Minimum basic training requirements, which a 22    probationary county corrections officer must 23    satisfactorily complete before being eligible for 24    permanent employment as a county corrections officer for a 25    participating local governmental agency.26        f. Minimum basic training requirements which a   SB0274- 14 -LRB104 03914 RLC 13938 b1    probationary court security officer must satisfactorily 2    complete before being eligible for permanent employment as 3    a court security officer for a participating local 4    governmental agency. The Board shall establish those 5    training requirements which it considers appropriate for 6    court security officers and shall certify schools to 7    conduct that training. 8        A person hired to serve as a court security officer 9    must obtain from the Board a certificate (i) attesting to 10    the officer's successful completion of the training 11    course; (ii) attesting to the officer's satisfactory 12    completion of a training program of similar content and 13    number of hours that has been found acceptable by the 14    Board under the provisions of this Act; or (iii) attesting 15    to the Board's determination that the training course is 16    unnecessary because of the person's extensive prior law 17    enforcement experience.18        Individuals who currently serve as court security 19    officers shall be deemed qualified to continue to serve in 20    that capacity so long as they are certified as provided by 21    this Act within 24 months of June 1, 1997 (the effective 22    date of Public Act 89-685). Failure to be so certified, 23    absent a waiver from the Board, shall cause the officer to 24    forfeit his or her position.25        All individuals hired as court security officers on or 26    after June 1, 1997 (the effective date of Public Act   SB0274- 15 -LRB104 03914 RLC 13938 b1    89-685) shall be certified within 12 months of the date of 2    their hire, unless a waiver has been obtained by the 3    Board, or they shall forfeit their positions.4        The Sheriff's Merit Commission, if one exists, or the 5    Sheriff's Office if there is no Sheriff's Merit 6    Commission, shall maintain a list of all individuals who 7    have filed applications to become court security officers 8    and who meet the eligibility requirements established 9    under this Act. Either the Sheriff's Merit Commission, or 10    the Sheriff's Office if no Sheriff's Merit Commission 11    exists, shall establish a schedule of reasonable intervals 12    for verification of the applicants' qualifications under 13    this Act and as established by the Board.14        g. Minimum in-service training requirements, which a 15    law enforcement officer must satisfactorily complete every 16    3 years. Those requirements shall include constitutional 17    and proper use of law enforcement authority; procedural 18    justice; civil rights; human rights; reporting child abuse 19    and neglect; autism-informed law enforcement responses, 20    techniques, and procedures; and cultural competency, 21    including implicit bias and racial and ethnic sensitivity. 22    These trainings shall consist of at least 30 hours of 23    training every 3 years.24        h. Minimum in-service training requirements, which a 25    law enforcement officer must satisfactorily complete at 26    least annually. Those requirements shall include law   SB0274- 16 -LRB104 03914 RLC 13938 b1    updates, emergency medical response training and 2    certification, crisis intervention training, and officer 3    wellness and mental health.4        i. Minimum in-service training requirements as set 5    forth in Section 10.6.6    Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the 7changes made to this Section by Public Act 101-652, Public Act 8102-28, and Public Act 102-694 take effect July 1, 2022. 9(Source: P.A. 102-28, eff. 6-25-21; 102-345, eff. 6-1-22; 10102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-694, eff. 1-7-22; 102-982, eff. 117-1-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-949, eff. 1-1-25.)